Utah statutes.
76-8-803.   Causing or omitting to note defects in articles used in
preparation for defense or war.
Whoever intentionally makes or causes to be made or omits to note on
inspection any defect in any article or thing with reasonable grounds to
believe that the article or thing is intended to be used in connection with
the preparation of the United States or any of the states for defense or for
war, or for the prosecution of war by the United States, or that the article
or thing is one of a number of similar articles or things, some of which are
intended so to be used, shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree.
